District of Columbia statutes.
5-335.02

Post-and-forfeit amounts.

(a)

The Superior Court shall determine the amount of money that is associated with each misdemeanor qualified for resolution using the post-and-forfeit procedure as determined by the OAG pursuant to § 5-335.01(c).

(b)

Within 90 days after the Superior Court issues an updated list of the amount of money associated with each qualified misdemeanor, the Chief of Police shall issue the list of misdemeanors that law enforcement officers are authorized to resolve using the post-and-forfeit procedure. The Chief of Police shall make the list available to the public, including placing the list on the MPD website and having it available for review in each police station.

History

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-352, § 303
as added Apr. 24, 2015, D.C. Law 20-243, § 3(b), 61 DCR 8320